src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@lõtv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õT2v%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õõmav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõpiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õõpiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õõtsuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
läbitav+A:läbitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@läbiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@läbiv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
lähenev+A:lähenev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lähtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ähtuv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@läikiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘äikiv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lämbuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ämbuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lämmatav+A:lämmatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
läpatav+A:läpatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lärmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ärmav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lömitav+A:lömitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lööv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ööv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
lükatav+A:lükatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@magav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@magav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
mahendav+A:mahendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mahtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘ahtuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
mahutav+A:mahutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@makstav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘akstav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
maksustatav+A:maksustatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
manipuleeritav+A:manipuleeritav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
masendav+A:masendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@meeldiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘eeldiv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
meelitav+A:meelitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
meelitlev+A:meelitlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
meenutav+A:meenutav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@meenuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘eenuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@minev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@minev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
monteeritav+A:monteeritav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
moodustav+A:moodustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
moodustuv+A:moodustuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mugav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@mugav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
mullitav+A:mulʲlitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@murduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘urduv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
muretsev+A:muretsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mustav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘ustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
muudetav+A:muudetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@muutuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘uutuv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mõeldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘õeldav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
mõistetav+A:mõistetav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
mõjutav+A:mõjutav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mõjuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@mõjuv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
mõnulev+A:mõnulev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mõtlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘õtlev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
mädanev+A:mädanev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mängiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘ängiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mänglev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘änglev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
märatsev+A:märatsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
märgatav+A:märgatav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mäslev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘äslev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mässav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘ässav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@määrav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘äärav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mööduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘ööduv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
mürisev+A:mürisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@müübiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘üübiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@müüdav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘üüdav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@müüv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘üüv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
naeratav+A:naeratav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
nakatav+A:nakatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nakkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘akkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
naljatlev+A:nalʲjatlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
narmendav+A:narmendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
nauditav+A:nauditav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nautiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘autiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
nimetatav+A:nimetatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
nimetav+A:nimetav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@niutsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘iutsuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
nohisev+A:nohisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@noomiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘oomiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@noriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@noriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuheldav+A:nuheldav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
nukrutsev+A:nukrutsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nõelav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘õelav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
nõretav+A:nõretav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nõustuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘õustuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nõutav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘õutav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nägev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@nägev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nähtav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ähtav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@näitav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘äitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@näiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘äiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@näriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@näriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nöökav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘öökav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@odav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@odav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
ohustav+A:ohustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@oigav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘oigav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
olenev+A:olenev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
oletatav+A:oletatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
oletav+A:oletav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
omandatav+A:omandatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
omandav+A:omandav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
omastatav+A:omastatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
omastav+A:omastav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
omav+A:omav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
oodatav+A:oodatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ootav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ootav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
orienteeriv+A:orient˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
originaalitsev+A:originaalitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
osalev+A:osalev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
osastav+A:osastav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@osav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@osav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@oskav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘oskav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ostetav+A:ostetav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
osutav+A:osutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
otsitav+A:otʲsitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@otsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘otʲsiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
otsustav+A:otsustav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@paeluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘aeluv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
pahandav+A:pahandav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pahv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘ahv TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@paiknev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘aiknev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@painav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘ainav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@painduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘ainduv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@paiskuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘aiskuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@paisuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘aisuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@paitav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘aitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
pakatav+A:pakatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
pakitsev+A:pakitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pakkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘akkuv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@palav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@palav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@paluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@paluv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pandav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘andav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@panev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@panev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
parastav+A:parastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@parkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘arkiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
peenutsev+A:peenutsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
pehmendav+A:pehmendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
peibutav+A:peibutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@peituv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘eituv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
peletav+A:peletav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
perutav+A:perutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pidav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pidav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pidev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pidev MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
pidurdav+A:pidurdav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
pigistav+A:pigistav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@piiksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘iiksuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
piinatav+A:piinatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@piinav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘iinav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@piirav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘iirav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@piirnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘iirnev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@piisav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘iisav MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
piitsutav+A:piitsutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
pikenev+A:pikenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pilav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pilav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
pildistatav+A:pilʲdistatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pilkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘ilkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
